agul.noun.lexd
LEXICON NounPlNom
ӏаб:ӏабар
ӏатӏуб:ӏатӏубар
ӏачӏ:ӏачӏар
ӏевам:ӏевамар
ӏелим:ӏелимар
ӏемал:ӏемалар
ӏешал:ӏешалар
ӏучал:ӏучалар
ӏуькӏ:ӏуькӏер
ӏуьмур:ӏуьмурар
ӏуьрдеккен:ӏуьрдеккенар
ӏуьтӏуб:ӏуьтӏубар
ӏуьш:ӏуьшар
абанкьул:абанкьулар
агуб:агубар
агъ:агъар
агъ:агъар
агъу:агъувур
ад:адар
айван:айванар
айгъур:айгъурар
алат:алатар
алучӏуб:алучӏубар
аслан:асланар
атӏуб:атӏубар
ахсар:ахсарар
ахтта:ахттавур
ахттигьар:ахттигьарар
ахттилатчи:ахттилатчивур
ахун:ахунар
ахъихьуб:ахъихьубар
ачӏ:ачӏар
аш:ашар
ашкӏин:ашкӏинар
баб:бабар
багам:багамар
багниш:багнишар
багур:багурар
багъ:багъар
багъ:багъар
багъдихъан:багъдихъанар
багьадур:багьадурар
бадра:бадравур
бармак:бармакар
беӏ:беӏер
бегӏли:бегӏливур
берхӏем:берхӏемар
бизи:бизивур
бишикӏ:бишикӏар
бугьу:бугьувур
булах:булахар
вурдж:вурджар
вакк:ваккар
вакъ:вакъар
вахтт:вахттар
вев:вевер
вец:вецар
гӏабдал:гӏабдалар
гӏад:гӏадар
гӏан:гӏанар
гӏаттивуб:гӏаттивубар
гӏафна:гӏафнавур
гӏелим:гӏелимар
гӏилми:гӏилмивур
гӏихьуб:гӏихьубар
гӏуб:гӏубар
гӏуд:гӏудар
гӏул:гӏулар
гӏур:гӏурар
гӏурч:гӏурчар
гӏурчахъан:гӏурчахъанар
гавгьар:гавгьарар
газа:газавур
гал:галар
гап:гапар
гардан:гарданар
гвадж:гваджар
гилегв:гилегвар
гим:гимар
гирав:гиравар
гирген:гиргенар
гитан:гитанар
гуг:гугар
гунагь:гунагьар
гуни:гунивар
гур:гурар
гъаб:гъабар
гъад:гъадар
гъалатӏ:гъалатӏар
гъам:гъамар
гъара:гъаравур
гъараг:гъарагар
гъарачи:гъарачивур
гъвад:гъвадар
гъван:гъванар
гъил:гъилар
гъилив:гъиливар
гъун:гъунар
гъурагъал:гъурагъалар
гъургъуб:гъургъубар
гъурд:гъурдар
гъурт:гъуртар
гъуч:гъучар
гьава:гьававур
гьеч:гьечар
гьудуркӏуб:гьудуркӏубар
гьуккуб:гьуккубар
гьунар:гьунарар
гьучархьеб:гьучархьебар
дабакь:дабакьар
дабан:дабанар
дагьар:дагьарар
дагьра:дагьравур
дагьур:дагьурар
дад:дадар
дайиб:дайибар
дакьикьа:дакьикьавур
далил:далилар
дамдам:дамдамар
дан:данар
дарагъадж:дарагъаджар
дарамат:дараматар
дард:дардар
дарман:дарманар
дарс:дарсар
дарчин:дарчинар
дасмал:дасмалар
дафттар:дафттарар
деве:девевур
дегӏви:дегӏвивур
джемеӏет:джемеӏетар
джил:джилар
джихер:джихерар
джуваб:джувабар
диф:дифар
дукӏ:дукӏар
дуканчи:дуканчивур
дурахал:дурахалар
дуруц:дуруцар
дурхӏуб:дурхӏубар
дустт:дусттар
дусттагъ:дусттагъар
духттур:духттурар
дуч:дучар
душман:душманар
дуьнйа:дуьнйавур
дуьхӏуьб:дуьхӏуьбар
зав:завар
зарафатчи:зарафатчивур
зерфел:зерфелар
зерфел:зерфелар
ивур:ивурар
ивурихъан:ивурихъанар
ибхь:ибхьер
ибцӏел:ибцӏелар
игит:игитар
идара:идаравур
идеми:идемиар
иджвел:иджвелар
илан:иланар
илдеш:илдешар
иллеф:иллефилар
инсан:инсанар
ис:исар
исал:исалар
иттал:итталар
иттал:итталар
ифул:ифулар
ицӏул:ицӏулар
ишан:ишанар
ишан:ишанар
ишкилчи:ишкилчивур
иъ:иъер
йирхӏуб:йирхӏубар
кӏапӏал:кӏапӏалар
кӏаш:кӏашар
кӏеб:кӏебар
кӏедж:кӏеджар
кӏетӏа:кӏетӏавур
кӏил:кӏилар
кӏиркӏ:кӏиркӏар
кӏунтӏ:кӏунтӏар
кӏур:кӏурар
кӏур:кӏурар
кӏучӏ:кӏучӏар
кавха:кавхавур
кантӏ:кантӏар
кар:карар
кедихьуб:кедихьубар
келпит:келпитар
келхъуьб:келхъуьбар
кепек:кепекар
кируцуб:кируцубар
кквахӏ:кквахӏар
ккекк:ккеккер
ккел:ккелар
кулагъ:кулагъар
кулак:кулакар
кумак:кумакар
кумакчи:кумакчивур
кутӏул:кутӏулар
кутӏул:кутӏулар
куьча:куьчавур
къаб:къабар
къавахӏан:къавахӏанар
къайда:къайдавур
къала:къалавур
къаравул:къаравулар
къари:къаривур
къатир:къатирар
къафлан:къафланар
къачагъ:къачагъар
къвал:къвалар
къваркъв:къваркъвар
къвац:къвацар
къемч:къемчар
къемчи:къемчивур
къирагъ:къирагъар
къири:къиривур
къуджа:къуджавур
къунши:къуншивур
къух:къухар
къучма:къучмавур
къушум:къушумар
кьаабчи:кьаабчивур
кьаб:кьабар
кьабуч:кьабучар
кьал:кьалар
кьастт:кьасттар
кьасу:кьасувур
кьвани:кьванивур
кьулбан:кьулбанар
кьун:кьунар
кьуркь:кьуркьар
кьуркь:кьуркьар
кьутӏур:кьутӏурар
лек:лекар
лиӏ:лиӏер
лихун:лихунар
лихъун:лихъунар
лукӏ:лукӏар
луф:луфар
луькӏеб:луькӏебар
магӏишат:магӏишатар
маджал:маджалар
майдан:майданар
маккал:маккалар
мактаб:мактабар
макьала:макьалавур
макьалачи:макьалачивур
малайик:малайикар
малла:маллавур
маркв:марквмаркар
мархал:мархалар
мац:мацар
мац:мацар
мегӏелим:мегӏелимар
мегӏни:мегӏнивур
мез:мезар
мехь:мехьер
милат:милатар
милатчи:милатчивур
муг:мугар
мугӏ:мугӏар
муджур:муджурар
мукь:мукьар
мурад:мурадар
мурз:мурзар
муртт:мурттар
мурхӏ:мурхӏар
мурхьил:мурхьилар
муул:муулар
мухур:мухурар
мухуригьан:мухуригьанар
мучӏ:мучӏар
некьв:некьвар
нецӏв:нецӏвар
нис:нисар
нубат:нубатар
пайгъамбар:пайгъамбарар
парӏ:парӏар
паччагь:паччагьар
паччагьвел:паччагьвелар
пеӏ:пеӏер
пиша:пишавур
пул:пулар
пут:путар
рагӏ:рагӏар
рагъ:рагъар
ракк:раккар
ратт:раттар
рекъ:рекъер
руг:ругар
рудж:руджар
рукъал:рукъалар
руьхӏ:руьхӏар
сив:сивар
силеб:силебар
суал:суалар
сув:сувар
сул:сулар
сур:сурар
сурӏуьш:сурӏуьшар
сурат:суратар
сус:сусар
суфра:суфравур
суьри:суьривур
тӏагар:тӏагарар
тӏалаб:тӏалабар
тӏибитӏ:тӏибитӏар
тӏубул:тӏубулар
тӏул:тӏулар
тӏун:тӏунар
тарих:тарихар
тарих:тарихар
текӏил:текӏилар
ттур:ттурар
тук:тукар
тум:тумар
тухум:тухумар
угал:угалар
угъал:угъалар
укъуб:укъубар
ул:улар
урч:урчар
ус:усар
утун:утунар
фикир:фикирар
фун:фунар
хӏабаб:хӏабабар
хӏадад:хӏададар
хӏаягъ:хӏаягъар
хӏейван:хӏейванар
хӏеракатлу:хӏеракатлувур
хӏефтта:хӏефттавур
хӏикат:хӏикатар
хӏуни:хӏунивар
хӏуппахъан:хӏуппахъанар
хӏур:хӏурар
хӏуч:хӏучар
хӏуьл:хӏуьлар
хӏуяг:хӏуягар
хабар:хабарар
хабарчи:хабарчивур
халкь:халкьар
хибхел:хибхелар
хизан:хизанар
хил:хилар
хулагъ:хулагъар
хъадикӏиб:хъадикӏибар
хъаттхуруб:хъаттхурубар
хъветт:хъветтар
хъуьссу:хъуьссувур
хьар:хьарар
цӏагъун:цӏагъунар
чӏал:чӏалар
чӏар:чӏарар
чӏекӏ:чӏекӏер
чӏигъанчи:чӏигъанчивур
чӏил:чӏилар
чӏилӏан:чӏилӏанар
чӏир:чӏирар
чакмачи:чакмачивур
чувал:чувалар
чуллевел:чуллевелар
шагьидвел:шагьидвелар
шагьур:шагьурар
шиниккв:шиникквар
шишал:шишалар
эесси:эессивур
яӏар:яӏарар
яӏар:яӏарар
ягӏарвел:ягӏарвелар
ягъ:ягъар
якӏв:якӏвар
мурхӏ:мурхӏар
ӏашв:ӏашвар
абаб:абабар
агӏай:агӏаяр
адад:ададар
адждагьа:аджагьабур
асхъай:асхъаяр
ахв:ахвар
багв:багвар
будай:будаяр
ваз:вазар
гӏалашуй:гӏалашувар
гӏалашуй:гӏулар
гӏедат:гӏедатар
гаф:гафар
гъуй:гъурур
дар:дарар
делекчи:делекчибур
джикас:джикуна
емиш:емишар
йиркӏв:йиркӏвар
ккабалай:ккабалаяр
лихъванас:лихъуна
мекӏ:мекӏер
мерккв:меркквар
мехъв:мехъвар
руш:рушар
руш:шибер
сеӏет:сеӏетар
хӏуб:хӏуппар
хӏуькумат:хӏуькуматар
хал:хулар
ху:хуппар
хумбеф:хумбар
хъехъв:хъехъвер
хьиджарбаб:хьиджарбабар
хьиджардад:хьиджардадар
хьир:хумбар
цӏа:цӏабур
цал:цилар
чи:чияр
чу:чуппар
шуй:шувар
яхв:яхвар
